Utah statutes.
34-46-302.   Inspection of records by division.

(1)  A representative of the division may enter a place of employment during business hours to inspect a record as part of an investigation described in Section 34-46-301.

(2)  An effort of an employer to obstruct the division in the performance of its duties under this section is a violation of this chapter and subject to sanctions under Section 34-46-301.



Enacted by Chapter 174, 2009 General Session

